src/fst/morphology/stems/exceptions.lexc
LEXICON Exceptions

! Short form
ӹшке+Pron+Refl+Sg3+Dat:ӹш%>лӓнжӹ K ;

!! PROPER GIVEN NAMES
!Алина:Алина PROP_OLMA ;
!Вероника:Вероника PROP_OLMA ;

!! PROPER PATRONYMS
!Елисеевна:Елисеевна  PROP_OLMA ;
!Мокеевич:Мокеевич PROP_KOL ;

!! PROPER PLACE NAMES
Угарман+N+Prop:Угарман PROP_KOL "Nižni Novgorod" ;
Шывашар+N+Prop:Шывашар PROP_KOL "Tšeboksary" ;
